Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201571-8201
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-8201 to 71-8253 shall be known and may be cited as the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 1.
August 30, 2015